Washington statutes.
RCW 19.375.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter , unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Biometric identifier" means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual's biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or other unique biological patterns or characteristics that is used to identify a specific individual. "Biometric identifier" does not include a physical or digital photograph, video or audio recording or data generated therefrom, or information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, or operations under the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996.

(2) "Biometric system" means an automated identification system capable of capturing, processing, and storing a biometric identifier, comparing the biometric identifier to one or more references, and matching the biometric identifier to a specific individual.

(3) "Capture" means the process of collecting a biometric identifier from an individual.

(4) "Commercial purpose" means a purpose in furtherance of the sale or disclosure to a third party of a biometric identifier for the purpose of marketing of goods or services when such goods or services are unrelated to the initial transaction in which a person first gains possession of an individual's biometric identifier. "Commercial purpose" does not include a security or law enforcement purpose.

(5) "Enroll" means to capture a biometric identifier of an individual, convert it into a reference template that cannot be reconstructed into the original output image, and store it in a database that matches the biometric identifier to a specific individual.

(6) "Law enforcement officer" means a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a federal peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, organization, association, or any other legal or commercial entity, but does not include a government agency.

(8) "Security purpose" means the purpose of preventing shoplifting, fraud, or any other misappropriation or theft of a thing of value, including tangible and intangible goods, services, and other purposes in furtherance of protecting the security or integrity of software, accounts, applications, online services, or any person.

[ 2017 c 299 s 3.]